Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-276
Electronic communication, defined.

Electronic communication means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photooptical system but does not include:

(1) The radio portion of a cordless telephone communication that is transmitted between the cordless telephone handset and the base unit;

(2) Any wire or oral communication;

(3) Any communication made through a tone-only mobile paging device; or

(4) Any communication from a mobile tracking device as defined in section 86-2,103.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 138.